Illinois, session 104th, HB4415.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Financial Empowerment Commission Act. 6    Section 5. Financial Empowerment Commission. The Financial 7Empowerment Commission is created to review and recommend 8financial inclusion and empowerment as a statewide public 9policy priority. The Commission shall act as the State's 10primary coordinating body for financial empowerment 11initiatives. The Commission shall identify and monitor the 12effectiveness of quality programming and ensure equitable 13access to all financial empowerment initiatives across the 14State.15    The Commission shall also provide support to communities 16where residents face severe barriers to financial services, 17education, and resources by informing the residents of these 18communities of available funding and resources, by providing 19them with financial empowerment initiatives, or by connecting 20them to existing local services. These communities shall 21include areas that have limited access to affordable financial 22services, areas where money circulates slowly at high cost, 23areas that face financial vulnerability and instability, and   HB4415- 2 -LRB104 17046 WRO 30461 b1areas whose residents are often referred to as unbanked, 2underbanked, and underserved. 3    Section 10. Membership of the Commission.4    (a) The Commission shall consist of the following members:5        (1) four members appointed by the Governor;6        (2) the Comptroller or the Comptroller's designee;7        (3) the Treasurer or the Treasurer's designee;8        (4) the Superintendent of the State Board of Education 9    or the Superintendent's designee;10        (5) the Executive Director of the Board of Higher 11    Education;12        (6) one member appointed by the President of the 13    Senate; 14        (7) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 15    Senate;16        (8) one member appointed by the Speaker of the House 17    of Representatives; 18        (9) one member appointed by the Minority Leader of the 19    House of Representatives;20    (b) Members of the Commission shall receive no 21compensation for their services as members of the Commission; 22and23    (c) Members of the Commission shall meet quarterly as soon 24as is practicable after the effective date of this Act.   HB4415- 3 -LRB104 17046 WRO 30461 b1    Section 15. Powers and duties of the Commission.2    (a) The Commission may collaborate with State and federal 3agencies, local governments, research and educational 4institutions, community and nonprofit organizations, financial 5institutions, the 3 main credit bureaus, service providers, 6and philanthropic organizations in an advisory capacity to 7ensure a coordinated, comprehensive approach with equitable 8access to resources and programming.9    (b) The Commission may issue advisory material to 10stakeholders across Illinois to ensure monitoring, compliance, 11and adherence to consumer protection standards. The Commission 12may issue a report to the Governor and associated State 13agencies on best practices concerning consumer protections.14    (c) The Commission may make advisory policy 15recommendations to the General Assembly to enhance Illinois 16students' financial literacy and use of new and existing 17resources and may recommend that education programs be 18supported by economic policies dismantling structural issues, 19such as income disparities and financial barriers to health 20care.21    (d) The Commission shall support the Board of Higher 22Education and organizations that provide financial education 23programming through various capacity building initiatives.24    (e) The Commission, in consultation with the Governor and 25appropriate State agencies, shall design a database platform 26to communicate with and connect existing financial literacy   HB4415- 4 -LRB104 17046 WRO 30461 b1resources, programs, products and services in the State.2    (f) The Commission shall identify, document, and track key 3metrics for young adults' financial health and well-being over 4time, including, but not limited to:5        (1) reductions in student loan default rates;6        (2) increases in credit scores;7        (3) reductions in overall bankruptcies filed;8        (4) changes in the number of new bank accounts 9    certified by a national organization that advocates for 10    unbanked and underbanked individuals opened;11        (5) changes in unemployment rates based on data from 12    the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics;13        (6) changes in average salary of different age groups 14    based on data from the United States Bureau of Labor 15    Statistics;16        (7) changes in household debt-to-income ratios based 17    on data from the Federal Reserve;18        (8) any information obtained by the Commission through 19    a State survey that measures financial confidence across 20    various aspects of financial well-being across the State; 21    and22        (9) any additional metrics the Commission finds to be 23    appropriate for measuring its success. 24    Section 20. Reporting requirements. On December 31, 2027, 25and December 31 of each year thereafter, the Commission shall   HB4415- 5 -LRB104 17046 WRO 30461 b1submit an annual report to the General Assembly. The report 2shall detail the progress of financial empowerment efforts, 3shall describe achievement of the Commission's main 4objectives, and a detailed analysis of the status of equitable 5access to financial products and services for all residents of 6the State. The report shall include all of the information the 7Commission is required to identify, track, and document under 8subsection (f) of Section 15.